Utah statutes.
10-6-137.   City recorder -- Office -- Meetings and records -- Certified records as evidence.

The office of the city recorder shall be located at the place of the governing body or at some other place convenient thereto as the governing body may direct. The city recorder or deputy city recorder shall attend the meetings and keep the record of the proceedings of the governing body. Copies of all papers filed in the recorder's office and transcripts from all records of the governing body, if certified by the recorder under the corporate seal, are admissible in all courts as originals.

